Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202282-326
Public buildings; appropriation; works of art; administration and installation; art maintenance fund.

The amount of money made available from any appropriations under the provisions of sections 82-317 to 82-329, 85-106 to 85-106.03, and 85-304 to 85-304.03 shall be used, in addition to the cost of the works of art, to provide for the administration by the contracting agency, the architect, and the Nebraska Arts Council, and for costs of installation of the works of art as negotiated between the contracting agency and the contracted artist. The Nebraska Arts Council may designate a portion of the amount appropriated for administration for an art maintenance fund which shall be used to repair or restore all works of art acquired under such sections and which shall be credited to the Nebraska Arts Council Cash Fund.

Laws 1978, LB 664, § 18;

Laws 2010, LB1063, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB957, § 11.